Massachusetts, session 194th, H771.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 19A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 45. (a) The department shall establish and administer a statewide community
connect program where individuals, including students and working adults, can volunteer to
assist seniors with the following:
(i) developing technological skills including, but not limited to: using smartphones, video
calls or emails;
(ii) assisting with daily tasks such as grocery shopping or other errands; and
(iii) providing companionship through regular visits or activities.
of 2

(b) Subject to appropriation, the department shall establish senior resources centers
within senior living facilities and senior community centers. The senior resources centers shall
provide the following:
(i) health services, including basic health check-ups, screenings and preventive care
resources for seniors;
(ii) counseling, including mental health support, grief counseling and stress management;
(iii) legal aid, including free or low-cost legal advice on wills, housing rights and elder
abuse protection; and
(iv) workshops, including information sessions on financial literacy, healthy aging and
technology usage.
(c) Students who volunteer for the community connect program shall be eligible for
credits towards community service.
(d) The department shall establish and distribute community service awards recognizing
individuals who have volunteered for the community connect program.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect 1 year after its passage.
of 2